Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5695.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 73. (1) The drain commissioner shall secure, from a professional engineer, plans, specifications, and an estimate of cost a cost estimate of the a proposed drain and descriptions of the lands or rights of way needed for the proposed drain. (2) Not later than 14 days after the drain commissioner's receipt of the plans, specifications, and a cost estimate from the professional engineer under subsection (1), if the cost estimate is $75,000.00 or greater, the drain commissioner shall provide a copy of the plans, specifications, and a cost estimate to the county road commission. The county road commission shall review the plans, specifications, and a cost estimate and do 1 of the following: (a) Determine that the cost of the proposed drain is reasonable and recommend to the drain commissioner that the proposed drain proceed. (b) Determine that the cost of the proposed drain is excessive and recommend to the drain commissioner that the proposed drain not proceed. (c) Make no determination regarding the cost of the proposed drain and make no recommendation to the drain commissioner. (3) The county road commission shall review the plans, specifications, and a cost estimate of a proposed drain received under subsection (2) at the county road commission's first meeting after the date on which the county road commission received the plans, specifications, and a cost estimate. The county road commission has not less than 60 days after the meeting at which the county road commission reviewed the plans, specifications, and a cost estimate to inform the drain commissioner of the county road commission's determination and recommendation if the county road commission has a determination and recommendation. (4) If the drain commissioner receives a determination and recommendation from the county road commission under subsection (2), the drain commissioner shall consider the road commission's determination and recommendation. If the drain commissioner does not receive a determination and recommendation from the county road commission, the drain commissioner may proceed with the proposed drain not less than 60 days after the meeting at which the county road commission reviewed the plans, specifications, and a cost estimate of the proposed drain. (5) In approving the route of the drain a drain's route as furnished provided by the engineers professional engineer, the drain commissioner shall not be limited to that the route described in the petition or in the first order of determination, if the a new route is more efficient and serviceable. (6) The drain commissioner shall endeavor to secure from the owners of each parcel or tract of land to be traversed or damaged by the proposed drain or drains an easement or release of right of way and all related damages. on account thereof. (7) As used in this section, "county road commission" means the board of county road commissioners elected or appointed under section 6 of chapter IV of 1909 PA 283, MCL 224.6, or, in the case of a charter county with a population of 750,000 or more with an elected county executive that does not have a board of county road commissioners, the county executive for ministerial functions and the county commission provided for in section 14(1)(d) of 1966 PA 293, MCL 45.514, for legislative functions. In addition, if a board of county road commissioners is dissolved as provided under section 6 of chapter IV of 1909 PA 283, MCL 224.6, county road commission includes the county board of commissioners of the county. Sec. 125. (1) At such a meeting the respective drain commissioners shall hear the proofs and allegations offered and shall reconsider and review the descriptions of land in that county forming a part of the drainage district, the apportionment of benefits, and define and equalize the same as may seem just and equitable. The persons entitled to appear and offer proof may appeal from such the review and the manner of taking such an appeal shall be must proceed as prescribed in chapter 7, of this act, being sections 151 to 161, inclusive. (2) Bids shall must be received and computation of the total cost of the proposed drain shall must be made, as hereinafter provided in this chapter, before the time set for review of the apportionment, and such the computation shall must be open to inspection at the time of review. If such the computation shall not cannot be completed before the day of review, such the review may be adjourned from time to time, not more than 20 days in all to allow for the completion of such the computation, or a new hearing may be called with like notice by publication, posting, and service at least not less than 10 days before such the hearing. If, for any reason, the contracts on which such the computation was based shall must not be executed and new contracts shall be are let at a higher price, a corrected computation shall must be made and a new review held with like notice. (3) Not later than 60 days after the drain commissioners' receipt of the computation of the total cost of the proposed drain under subsection (2), if the computation is $75,000.00 or greater, the drain commissioners shall provide a copy of the computation and any documents used to complete the computation to each county road commission of a county in the drainage district. Each county road commission of a county in the drainage district shall review the computation and any documents used to complete the computation, and do 1 of the following: (a) Determine that the cost of the proposed drain is reasonable and recommend to the drain commissioners that the proposed drain proceed. (b) Determine that the cost of the proposed drain is excessive and recommend to the drain commissioners that the proposed drain not proceed. (c) Make no determination regarding the cost of the proposed drain and make no recommendation to the drain commissioners. (4) Each county road commission of a county in the drainage district shall review the computation and any documents used to complete the computation received under subsection (3) at each county road commission's first meeting after the date on which each county road commission received the computation and any documents used to complete the computation. Each county road commission of a county in the drainage district has not less than 60 days after the meeting at which the county road commission reviewed the computation and any documents used to complete the computation to inform the drain commissioners of the county road commission's determination and recommendation if the county road commission has a determination and recommendation. (5) If the drain commissioners receive a determination and recommendation from a county road commission of a county in the drainage district ?under subsection (2), the drain commissioners shall consider the county road commission's determination and recommendation. If the drain commissioners do not receive a determination and recommendation from a county road commission of a county in the drainage district, the drain commissioners may proceed with the proposed drain not less than 60 days after the first meeting at which a county road commission of a county in the drainage district reviewed the computation and any documents used to complete the computation. (6) As used in this section, "county road commission" means the board of county road commissioners elected or appointed under section 6 of chapter IV of 1909 PA 283, MCL 224.6, or, in the case of a charter county with a population of 750,000 or more with an elected county executive that does not have a board of county road commissioners, the county executive for ministerial functions and the county commission provided for in section 14(1)(d) of 1966 PA 293, MCL 45.514, for legislative functions. In addition, if a board of county road commissioners is dissolved as provided under section 6 of chapter IV of 1909 PA 283, MCL 224.6, county road commission includes the county board of commissioners of the county.